test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-taeuesj20_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - täüsʼ: # Noun (20) täüsʼ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm

    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Nom: täüsʼ
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Gen: tävve
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Par: täüt
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Ill: täüde
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Ine: [tävven, tävveh, tävvehn]
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Ela: tävvest
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+All: tävvele
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Ade: tävvel
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Abl: tävvelt
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Tra: tävves
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Ter: tävveniq
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Abe: tävveldäq
    täüsʼ+N+Sg+Com: [tävvegaq, tävvega]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Nom: tävveq
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Gen: [täüsi, täüte]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Par: täüsi
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [täüsihe, täüside]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Ine: [täüsin, täüsih, täüsihn, täüten, täüteh, täütehn]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Ela: [täüsist, täütest]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+All: [täüsile, täütele]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Ade: [täüsil, täütel]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Abl: [täüsilt, täütelt]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Tra: [täüsis, täütes]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Ter: [täüsiniq, täüteniq]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Abe: [täüsildäq, täüsildä, täüteldäq, täüteldä]
    täüsʼ+N+Pl+Com: [täüsigaq, täüsiga, täütegaq, täütega]
